Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-108
Grand jury; instructions with respect to jails and discipline; duty of district court.

It shall be the duty of the district court in its charge to the grand jury to inform the jury of the provisions of sections 47-101 to 47-116 and all rules, plans, or regulations established by the Jail Standards Board relating to county jails and prison discipline.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 8, p. 245;

R.S.1913, § 3536;

C.S.1922, § 3003;

C.S.1929, § 47-108;

R.S.1943, § 47-108;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 8.